Washington statutes.
RCW 18.104.070

Water well operator's license.

A person shall be qualified to receive a water well operator's license if the person:

(1) Has submitted a completed application to the department on forms provided by the department and has paid to the department the application fee determined by rule adopted pursuant to this chapter; and

(2) Has the field experience and educational training required by rule adopted by the department pursuant to this chapter; and

(3) Has passed a written examination as provided for in RCW 18.104.080; and

(4) Has passed an on-site examination by the department if the person's qualifying field experience under subsection (2) of this section is from another state. The department may waive the on-site examination.

[ 1993 c 387 s 12; 1987 c 394 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 212 s 7.]